Hawaii, session 2026, GM1130.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII:
SECTION 1. Section 302A-804, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended as follows:
1. By amending subsection (b) to read:
"(b) The department's powers and duties under this subpart
shall be limited to:
(1) Hiring, except in emergency situations as described in
this chapter, licensed teachers to teach in their
fields of licensing;
(2) Reporting data annually to the board about the supply
of, and demand for, teachers in department schools,
including the identification of shortage areas,
out-of-field teaching assignments, number of
classrooms without a licensed teacher for a quarter or
more, numbers of teachers teaching out-of-field,
numbers and types of courses and classes taught by
out-of-field teachers, and numbers and types of
students taught by out-of-field teachers;
2026-2535 SB2125 CDl SMA.docx 1
iniiiiiiBniiiiiiiiiiiiiiiii

Page 2
S.B. NO.
-1
C.D. 1
(3) On an emergency and case-by-case basis, hiring
unlicensed individuals; provided that:
(A) A list of the names, work sites, teaching
assignments, and progress toward licensing of
these individuals shall be reported to the board
and any changes shall be updated on a monthly
basis by the department;
(B) There are no properly licensed teachers for the
specific assignments for which the individuals
are being hired; and
(C) No individual may be employed by the department
on an emergency basis for more than [^fe4«?ee] five
years; provided that in the case of a declaration
of a state of emergency pursuant to section
127A-14, the board, pursuant to its powers in
section 302A-803(a)(18), may extend the [three-
year] five-year period by authorizing an
extension to complete licensing requirements [-r
Pur-ing] ; provided further that during this time,
the individual shall demonstrate active pursuit
of licensing in each year of employment [-t]
2026-2535 SB2125 CDl SMA.docx
iininniHiiiiMiiiiviH^^^

Page 3 S.B. NO.
• h.D. 2
C.D. 1
through continuous and verifiable progress toward
satisfying licensing requirements, including
enrollment in an approved teacher education
program, completion of relevant coursework,
mentorship, application of necessary credentials,
or other method approved by the board;
(4) Submitting an annual report to the board documenting:
(A) The number of emergency hires in department
schools by subject matter areas and by school;
(B) The reasons and duration of employment for the
emergency hiring enumerated in subparagraph (A);
and
(C) The department's efforts to address the shortages
described in subparagraph (A); and
(5) Providing any other information requested by the board
that is pertinent to its powers and duties."
2. By amending subsection (d) to read:
"(d) A charter school's powers and duties under this
subpart shall be limited to:
2026-2535 SB2125 CDl SMA.docx 3
IllllWIIIIIIillllllllllllllilll

Page 4 2125
S.B. NO.
S.D. 1
H.D. 2
C.D. 1
(1) Except in emergency situations as described in this
chapter, hiring licensed teachers to teach in their
fields of licensing;
(2) On an emergency and case-by-case basis, hiring
unlicensed individuals; provided that:
(A) A list of the names, work sites, teaching
assignments, and progress toward licensing of
these individuals shall be reported to the board
and any changes shall be updated on a monthly
basis by the charter schools;
(B) There are no properly licensed teachers for the
specific assignments for which the individuals
are being hired; and
(C) No individual may be employed by the charter
school on an emergency basis for more than
[three] five years; provided that in the case of
a declaration of a state of emergency pursuant to
section 127A-14, the board, pursuant to its
powers in section 302A-803(a) (18), may extend the
[three-year] five-year period by authorizing an
extension to complete licensing requirements[t
2026-2535 SB2125 CDl SMA.docx
liMniiiiiiHHiimiiiiii

Pages S.B. NO. 2125
S.D. 1
H.D.2
CD. 1
; provided further that during this time,
the individual shall demonstrate active pursuit
of licensing in each year of employment [-#-]
through continuous and verifiable progress toward
satisfying the licensing reguirements, including
enrollment in an approved teacher education
program, completion of relevant coursework,
mentorship, application of necessary credentials,
or other method approved by the board;
(3) Submitting an annual report to the board documenting:
(A) The number of emergency hires in the charter
school by subject matter areas;
(B) The reasons and duration of employment for the
emergency hiring enumerated in subparagraph (A);
(C) The number of classrooms without a licensed
teacher for a quarter or more;
(D) The number and type of courses and classes taught
by out-of-field teachers; and
(E) The number and type of students taught by out-of­
field teachers; and
2026-2535 SB2125 CDl SMA.docx 5
IMiliMlllllillBllllNIIBIl

Page 6 2125
S.B. NO.
S.D. 1
H.D. 2
C.D. 1
(4) Providing any other information requested by the board
that is pertinent to the charter school's powers and
duties."
SECTION 2. Statutory material to be repealed is bracketed
and stricken. New statutory material is underscored.
SECTION 3. This Act shall take effect upon its approval;
provided that on June 30, 2031, this Act shall be repealed and
section 302A-804, Hawaii Revised Statutes, shall be reenacted in
the form in which it read on the day prior to the effective date
of this Act; provided further that any individual employed by
the department of education or a charter school on an emergency
basis pursuant to section 302A-804(b)(3) or (d)(2), Hawaii
Revised Statutes, before June 30, 2031, shall be permitted to
continue such employment for up to five years from the
individual's initial date of hire; provided further that the
individual shall continue to demonstrate active pursuit of
licensing each year of employment as required pursuant to this
Act.
2026-2535 SB2125 CDl SMA.docx 6
■iiniiHiiiiniiiiiiiiiH

S.B. NO.
H.D. 2
C.D. 1
APPROVED this 22nd day of May ,2026
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF HAWAI‘1

S.B. No. 2125, S.D. 1, H.D. 2, C.D. 1
THE SENATE OF THE STATE OF HAWAPI
Date: May 6, 2026
Honolulu, Hawai‘i 96813
We hereby certify that the foregoing Bill this day passed Final Reading in the Senate
of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawai‘i, Regular Session of 2026.
Clerk of the Senate
208-26

SB No. 2125, SD 1,HD 2, CD 1
THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES OF THE STATE OF HAWAII
Date: May 6, 2026
Honolulu, Hawaii
We hereby certify that the above-referenced Bill on this day passed Final Reading in the
House of Representatives of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawaii, Regular Session
of 2026.
Nadine K. Nakamura
Speaker
House of Representatives
Brian L. Takeshita
Chief Clerk
House of Representatives